Hawaii statutes.
§279A-9 Limitation of transportation units.
The council shall be responsible for limiting and curtailing the numbers and
kinds of transportation units in the State. The council shall determine, as
often as the council deems to be necessary or as required by the legislature,
after consultation with the department of traffic and other appropriate
departments of the counties, the number, size, and use of transportation units
of any kind that may be within the territory of any island of the State at any
one time. The council shall make its determination on the basis of preserving,
safeguarding, and enhancing the physical and mental health of the residents of
the State, and the ecology and environmental quality of the State, and shall
take into consideration the need for high priority and vital movement of people
and goods. The council shall report its findings to the legislature as soon as
its findings are completed. [L 1975, c 179, §9; am L 1979, c 26, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next